Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STATUE OF CHARLIE KIRK.new text end new text begin $25,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to design and construct a statue of Charlie Kirk to be placed on the university's Twin Cities campus. new text end